dictsource/sn_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Shona

.group a
   a       a

.group b
   b       b
   bh      b#
   bv      bv#

.group ch
   ch      tS

.group d
   d       d
   dh      d#
   dy      d;#
   dz      dz#

.group e
   e       e

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       g

.group h
   h       H

.group i
   i       i

.group j
   j       dZ

.group k
   k       k

.group l
   l       l

.group m
   m       m
   _) mb   m-b
   mb      mb
   mh      m#
   mv      mV

.group n
   n       n
   _) nd   n-d
   nd      nd
   ng      N
   nh      n#
   _) nj   n-dZ#
   nj      ndZ#
   ny      n^
   _) nz   n-z#
   nz      nz#
   _) nzv     nzB
   nzv     nzB

.group o
   o       o

.group p
   p       p
   pf      pf

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S
   sv      sf
   sw      skw

.group t
   t       t
   ts      ts
   tsv     tsf
   ty      t;k

.group u
   u       u

.group v
   v       V
   vh      v#

.group w
   w       w

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z#
   zh      Z#


.group
        $        d#ora
        %        muz#ana

        *        n^ota
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
